Washington statutes.
RCW 11.04.060

Tenancy in dower and by curtesy abolished.

The provisions of RCW 11.04.015, as to the inheritance of the husband and wife from each other take the place of tenancy in dower and tenancy by curtesy, which are hereby abolished.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.04.060. Prior: Code 1881 s 3304; 1875 p 55 s 3; RRS s 1343.]